Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4421
Sale or purchase of insurance; requirements.

(1) Any person other than a licensed surplus lines licensee acting or offering to act as an insurance producer for a risk retention group or purchasing group which solicits members, sells insurance coverage, purchases coverage for its members located within this state, or otherwise does business in this state shall, before commencing any such activity, obtain a license from the director pursuant to the Insurance Producers Licensing Act.

(2) Every person, firm, association, or corporation licensed pursuant to the Insurance Producers Licensing Act, on business placed with risk retention groups or written through a purchasing group, shall inform each prospective insured of the provisions of the notice required by section 44-4409 in the case of a risk retention group and subsection (2) of section 44-4418 in the case of a purchasing group.

Laws 1987, LB 514, § 21;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 269;

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 57;

Laws 2001, LB 51, § 35.

Insurance Producers Licensing Act, see section 44-4047.